zh-CN: 贴片背衬类型: 涂胶（需单独购买胶水）; 兼容热压机; 魔术贴（兼容 Velcro）; 熨烫/热活化; 无背衬（手缝）; 即撕即贴不干胶; 别针背衬; 仅需沿边缘缝合; 其他
ja: パッチバックタイプ: 接着タイプ（別途接着剤が必要）; ヒートプレス対応; 面ファスナー（ベルクロ対応）; アイロン接着/熱活性化; 裏地なし（縫い付け）; 剥がして貼る粘着タイプ; ピンバック; 縁のみ縫い付け; その他
nl: Type patch-achterkant: Op te lijmen (vereist aparte lijm); Compatibel met hittepers; Klittenband (Velcro-compatibel); Opstrijkbaar / door warmte geactiveerd; Geen achterkant (opnaaibaar); Zelfklevend (peel-and-stick); Speldsluiting; Opnaaibaar met alleen rand; Overig
da: Bagsidetype for patch: Til pålimning (kræver separat lim); Kompatibel med varmepresser; Velcro (krog og løkke); Strygemærke/varmeaktiveret; Ingen bagside (til påsyning); Selvklæbende (peel and stick); Pin-bagside; Til påsyning (kun kant); Andet
hu: Felvarró hátlap típusa: Ragasztható (külön ragasztót igényel); Hőpréssel kompatibilis; Tépőzáras (Velcro-kompatibilis); Vasalható / hőre aktiválódó; Hátoldal nélkül (felvarrható); Lehúzható és ragasztható; Tűzhető hátoldal; Csak szegéllyel felvarrható; Egyéb
fr: Type de support du patch: À coller (nécessite une colle séparée); Compatible avec presse à chaud; Bande autoagrippante (compatible Velcro); Thermocollant / thermoadhésif; Sans endos (à coudre); Adhésif autocollant; À épingle; À coudre avec bordure uniquement; Autre
tr: Yama arka yüzey tipi: Yapıştırmalı (ayrı yapıştırıcı gerektirir); Isı presiyle uyumlu; Cırt cırtlı (Velcro uyumlu); Ütüyle yapışan / ısı ile aktive olan; Astarsız (dikilebilir); Soy-yapıştır (yapışkanlı); İğne arkalıklı; Yalnızca kenardan dikilebilir; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de suporte do aplique: Colagem (requer cola à parte); Compatível com prensa térmica; Fecho aderente (compatível com velcro); Para engomar/ativado por calor; Sem base (para coser); Autocolante; Alfinete na parte traseira; Para coser apenas com rebordo; Outro
vi: Loại mặt sau của miếng vá: Dán keo (cần keo dán riêng); Tương thích với ép nhiệt; Băng dán gai (tương thích Velcro); Ủi dính / kích hoạt bằng nhiệt; Không có mặt lưng (may vào); Bóc và dán; Mặt lưng gài kim; Chỉ may ở viền; Khác
sk-SK: Typ podkladového materiálu pre nášivky: Na nalepenie (vyžaduje samostatné lepidlo); Kompatibilné s tepelným lisom; Suchý zips (kompatibilné s Velcro); Nažehľovacie / teplom aktivované; Bez podkladu (na prišitie); Odlepovacie a lepiace; So špendlíkom; Na prišitie iba s okrajom; Iné
de: Befestigungsart des Patches: Zum Aufkleben (erfordert separaten Kleber); Für Heißpresse geeignet; Klettverschluss (Velcro-kompatibel); Aufbügelbar / Wärmeaktiviert; Ohne Rückseite (zum Aufnähen); Selbstklebend; Anstecknadel-Rückseite; Zum Aufnähen (nur mit Rand); Sonstige
th: ประเภทวัสดุรองด้านหลังอาร์มปักลาย: แบบติดกาว (ต้องใช้กาวแยกต่างหาก); รองรับเครื่องรีดความร้อน; ตีนตุ๊กแก; แบบรีดติด / กระตุ้นด้วยความร้อน; ไม่มีแผ่นรองหลัง (แบบเย็บติด); กาวแบบลอกแล้วแปะ; แบบเข็มกลัด; แบบเย็บติดเฉพาะขอบ; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta podloge naljepnice: Lijepljenje (zahtijeva posebno ljepilo); Kompatibilno s toplinskom prešom; Čičak; Za glačanje / termoaktivacijsko; Bez podloge (za šivanje); Odlijepi-i-zalijepi; S pribadačom; Za šivanje, samo s rubom; Ostalo
fi: Merkin taustan tyyli: Liimattava (vaatii erillisen liiman); Lämpöprässillä kiinnitettävä; Tarranauha (Velcro-yhteensopiva); Silitettävä / lämpöaktivoituva; Ei taustaa (ommeltava); Tarratausta; Neulatausta; Ommeltava (vain reunat); Muu
ro-RO: Tip de suport pentru plasture: Aplicare cu lipici (necesită lipici separat); Compatibil cu presă termică; Scai (compatibil Velcro); Termocolant / activat la căldură; Fără strat de suport (de cusut); Adeziv cu desprindere și lipire; Prindere cu ac; De cusut doar cu margine; Altele
pt-BR: Patch, tipo de suporte: De colar (requer cola à parte); Compatível com prensa térmica; Fecho de contato (compatível com Velcro); Termocolante / ativado por calor; Sem forro (de costurar); Adesivo autocolante; Com alfinete; De costurar (apenas com borda); Outro
es: Tipo de respaldo del soporte: Para pegar (requiere pegamento por separado); Compatible con prensa térmica; Cierre de gancho y bucle (compatible con velcro); Termoadhesivo/activado por calor; Sin respaldo (para coser); Adhesivo despegable; Parte trasera con alfiler; Para coser solo con borde; Otro
pl: Typ podkładki naszywki: Do przyklejenia (wymaga oddzielnego kleju); Kompatybilne z prasą termiczną; Na rzep; Naprasowanka / aktywowane ciepłem; Bez podkładu (do naszycia); Samoprzylepne (odklej i przyklej); Na przypinkę; Do przyszycia (tylko z obramowaniem); Inne
lt-LT: Lopo pagrindo tipas: Klijuojamas (reikia atskirų klijų); Tinkamas terminiam presui; Kibusis („Velcro“ tipo); Užlyginamas / suaktyvinamas karščiu; Be pagrindo (prisiuvamas); Nulupamas ir priklijuojamas lipdukas; Su segtuku (Prisegamas); Prisiuvamas tik per kraštą; Kita
nb: Bakgrunnstype for lapp: Til påliming (krever separat lim); Kompatibel med varmepresse; Borrelås (Velcro-kompatibel); Til påstryking / varmeaktivert; Ingen bakside (til påsying); Selvklebende for avtrekk; Nålfeste; Til påsying kun med kant; Annet
ru: Тип основы патча: Приклеиваемая (требует клея); Для термопресса; Липучка (совместимо с Velcro); Приутюживаемая / термоактивируемая; Без подложки (пришивная); Самоклеящаяся; На булавке; Пришивная (только по краю); Другое
bg-BG: Тип основа на нашивката: За залепване (изисква отделно лепило); Съвместимо с термопреса; Велкро; За гладене / термоактивиращо се; Без подложка (за пришиване); Със самозалепващ се гръб; С карфица; За пришиване само по борда; Друго
sv: Typ av fästning för tygmärke: För limning (kräver separat lim); Kompatibel med värmepress; Kardborreband; Stryks på / värmeaktiverad; Utan baksida (sys på); Självhäftande; Nålfäste; Sys på (endast kant); Övrigt
en: Patch backing type: Glue-on (requires separate glue); Heat press compatible; Hook & loop (Velcro compatible); Iron-on / heat-activated; No backing (sew-on); Peel-and-stick adhesive; Pin-back; Sew-on with border only; Other
cs: Typ podkladu nášivky: Nalepovací (vyžaduje samostatné lepidlo); Kompatibilní s tepelným lisem; Suchý zip (kompatibilní s Velcro); Nažehlovací / aktivované teplem; Bez podkladu (našívací); Samolepicí (odlepovací); Připínací; Našívací (pouze s okrajem); Ostatní
zh-TW: 貼片背膠類型: 塗膠黏合 (需要獨立膠水); 相容於熱壓機; 魔鬼氈 (相容 Velcro); 熨燙 / 遇熱黏合; 無背膠 (縫合式); 撕貼背膠; 別針背底; 僅含邊框的縫合式; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta hrbtne strani emblemske krpe: Za lepljenje (potrebuje ločeno lepilo); Združljivo s toplotno prešo; Na ježka (združljivo z Velcro); Za likanje / toplotno aktivirano; Brez podlage (za šivanje); Samolepilno (odlepi in prilepi); Zaponka na zadnji strani; Samo obroba za šivanje; Drugo
it: Tipo di supporto della toppa: Da incollare (richiede colla a parte); Compatibile con termopressa; Strappo (compatibile con Velcro); Termoadesivo / da stirare; Senza retro (da cucire); Adesivo stacca e attacca; Retro con spilla; Da cucire solo con bordo; Altro
ko: 패치 뒷면 유형: 본드 접착(별도 접착제 필요); 열 프레스 호환; 훅 앤 루프(벨크로 호환); 다리미용/열 접착식; 뒷면 없음(바느질용); 떼어서 붙이는 접착식; 핀 고정식; 테두리만 바느질; 기타
el: Τύπος βάσης επιθέματος: Με κόλληση (απαιτεί ξεχωριστή κόλλα); Συμβατό με πρέσα θερμότητας; Χριτς-χρατς (συμβατό με Velcro); Σιδερότυπο / ενεργοποιείται με θερμότητα; Χωρίς υπόστρωμα (ραφτό); Αυτοκόλλητο; Με καρφίτσα; Ραφτό μόνο με περίγραμμα; Άλλο